Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.056

License suspension—Electronic benefit cards.

The director shall immediately suspend any license issued under this chapter if the director receives information that the license holder has not complied with RCW 74.08.580(2). If the license holder has otherwise remained eligible to be licensed, the director may reinstate the suspended license when the holder has complied with RCW 74.08.580(2).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 18.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 74.08A.260.

Finding—2011 1st sp.s. c 42: See note following RCW 74.04.004.